Utah statutes.
76-8-508.5.   Tampering with juror -- Retaliation against juror -- Penalty.
(1)  As used in this section "juror" means a person:
(a)  summoned for jury duty; or
(b)  serving as or having served as a juror or alternate juror in any court or
as a juror on any grand jury of the state.
(2)  A person is guilty of tampering with a juror if he attempts to or
actually influences a juror in the discharge of the juror's service by:
(a)  communicating with the juror by any means, directly or indirectly, except
for attorneys in lawful discharge of their duties in open court;
(b)  offering, conferring, or agreeing to confer any benefit upon the juror;
or
(c)  communicating to the juror a threat that a reasonable person would
believe to be a threat to injure:
(i)  the juror's person or property; or
(ii)  the person or property of any other person in whose welfare the juror is
interested.
(3)  A person is guilty of tampering with a juror if he commits any unlawful
act in retaliation for anything done by the juror in the discharge of the
juror's service:
(a)  to the juror's person or property; or
(b)  to the person or property of any other person in whose welfare the juror
is interested.
(4)  Tampering with a juror is a third degree felony.
